Wyoming, session 2025, HB0104.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-109(d) is amended to read:

39-11-109. Taxpayer remedies.

(d) Credits. There are no specific applicable
provisions for credits for this chapter. The following
shall apply:

HB0104

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0438
(i) Each full time resident of Wyoming shall be
entitled to a credit against any taxes paid to Wyoming for
each child of the person. The credit shall be two hundred
dollars ($200.00) per child. In no case shall the credit
authorized under this paragraph exceed the total taxes paid
by the person to a tax jurisdiction in Wyoming in the
applicable tax year. The credit shall be administered as
follows:

(A) Each person shall apply to the
department for the credit under this paragraph in a manner
and form required by the department not later than March 1
of each year following the applicable tax year. Each
applicant shall provide information required by the
department to determine the following:

(I) That the person resided in Wyoming
for the majority of the tax year;

(II) The number of children residing
in Wyoming for the majority of the tax year who are claimed
by the applicant as dependents;

HB0104

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0438
(III) That no other person is claiming
any of the claimed children as dependents; and

(IV) The amount of taxes paid by the
applicant to Wyoming in the applicable tax year. If the
applicant is only claiming to have paid sales and use taxes
to Wyoming and does not have documentation of the amount of
sales and use taxes paid in the tax year, the department
may determine a reasonable amount of sales and use taxes
paid, not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400.00).

(B) Following approval of an application,
the department shall provide a refund as determined under
this paragraph to each applicant in the amount of one
dollar ($1.00) of credit per one dollar ($1.00) of taxes
paid to Wyoming, not to exceed two hundred dollars
($200.00) per child of the applicant. Refunds shall be
provided out of funds appropriated to the department for
that purpose. In the event funds appropriated to the
department are insufficient to provided full refunds under
this subparagraph, refunds shall be prorated based on the
available funds and the number and amount of approved
refunds.
HB0104

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0438

Section 2. There is appropriated five million dollars
($5,000,000.00) from the general fund to the department of
revenue for the purposes of providing child tax credit
refunds as provided in W.S. 39-11-109(d) as amended by
section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the department's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. The department shall adopt rules necessary
to enable applications for child tax credit refunds under
W.S. 39-11-109(d) as amended by section 1 of this act not
later than January 1, 2026 for taxes paid in the 2025 tax
year.

HB0104

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0438
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0104